Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-366
Bids; special assessments; notice; levy.

The county board of such county may receive bids for constructing or repairing any or all such walks and may let contracts to the lowest responsible bidder for constructing or repairing the same.

The contractor or contractors shall be paid therefor from special assessments against the abutting property. The cost of constructing such sidewalks shall be assessed at a regular meeting of such county board by resolution, fixing the cost along abutting property as a special assessment against such property and the amount charged for the cost thereof with the vote by yeas and nays shall be spread upon the minutes. Notice of the time of such meeting of the county board and its purpose shall be published once in a newspaper published and of general circulation in such county at least five days before the meeting of the county board is to be held, or in place thereof, personal notice may be given such abutting property owners. Such special assessment shall be known as special sidewalk assessment and together with the cost of notice and necessary engineering services, shall be levied and collected as special taxes and shall draw interest at nine percent per annum from the date of levy thereof until satisfied.

Laws 1961, c. 92, § 2, p. 318.